New Jersey, session 221, S2179.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Every female inmate 60 years of age and under shall be tested for pregnancy upon entering a State correctional facility. Upon confirmation of pregnancy, the Commissioner of Corrections shall provide the appropriate prenatal and post-partum services for each pregnant inmate, including but not limited to the following: (1)   prenatal education; (2)   prenatal medical evaluation and care; (3)   nutritional counseling and supplements as prescribed by a physician; (4)   counseling regarding family planning, birth control, test results, termination of pregnancy, child placement services, and religious counseling, if desired by the inmate; and (5)   appropriate post-partum education and care. b.    A pregnant inmate electing to carry the pregnancy to term shall be provided ongoing prenatal care and support including obstetrical services, suitable maternity clothes, reasonable housing assignments, and appropriate exercise and reduced work schedules, as deemed medically advisable by the treating physician. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.